Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-211
Sign panels; rules and regulations.

The Department of Transportation shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations deemed necessary by the department to carry out sections 39-207 to 39-211.

Laws 1993, LB 108, § 5;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 93.